Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 115.1 of Title 43, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Section 115.1. A. Civil actions for failure to pay child
support may be brought by the custodial parent under the following
conditions:
1. The noncustodial parent fails to pay court ordered child
support for a consecutive three-month period.
2. The noncustodial parent purposely evades the court by
failing to accurately report income, and the custodial parent has
evidence of failure to disclose.


Req. No. 10367 Page 1

B. If courts find the noncustodial parent in violation of
Subsection A of this section, the court may order property and
assets to be seized in addition to requiring backpay.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10367 TKR 01/15/25


















Req. No. 10367 Page 2